Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-229
Town bylaws and regulations; publication.

It shall be the duty of the town clerk to cause all bylaws, rules, and regulations of the town, within twenty days after their adoption, to be published by posting in three public places in the town or by one insertion in any newspaper published in the county; but all such bylaws, rules, and regulations shall take effect and be in force from the date of their adoption, unless otherwise directed by the electors of the town.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 27, p. 140;

R.S.1913, § 1013;

C.S.1922, § 915;

C.S.1929, § 26-229;

R.S.1943, § 23-229.